District of Columbia statutes.
38-2001.12

Discharge of teachers.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to prevent the discharge of any teacher at any time in the discretion of the Board of Education of the District of Columbia under the provisions of law.

History

Jan. 15, 1920, 41 Stat. 389, ch. 39, § 12
June 11, 1926, 44 Stat. 730, ch. 556, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1213.
1973 Ed., § 31-713.